Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SANITARY SEWER SYSTEM EXPANSION AND IMPROVEMENTS; CHISAGO COUNTY.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation; expansion of sewer system. new text end new text begin $....... is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to Chisago County to predesign, design, and construct an extension of the Shorewood Park Sanitary Sewer District sewer system to 20 homes on Rush Lake. This appropriation is not available until the commissioner of management and budget determines that sufficient resources have been committed from nonstate sources to complete the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation; treatment pond. new text end new text begin $....... is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to Chisago County to acquire property and to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a sewage treatment pond in Chisago County for the Shorewood Park Sanitary Sewer District sewer system. This appropriation is not available until the commissioner of management and budget determines that sufficient resources have been committed from nonstate sources to complete the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $....... in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end